California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 department, in consultation with the California Housing Finance Agency and the Department of Housing and Community Development shall review all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the financing structure for acquisition and/or development of the real property.

(2) Any and all agreements that govern the real property’s ownership, occupancy, maintenance, management, and operation, to ensure that the use of the property is maintained for the benefit of persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) No sale encumbrance, hypothecation, assignment, refinancing, pledge, conveyance, exchange or transfer in any other form of the real property, or of any of its interest therein, shall occur without the prior written approval of the department and the Health and Human Services Agency.

(d) Notice of the restrictions pursuant to this section shall be recorded against the acquired or developed real property subject to this section.

(e) At least 45 days prior to granting approval under subdivision (c), the department shall provide notice to the chairs and vice chairs of the fiscal committees of the Assembly and the Senate, the Secretary of the Health and Human Services Agency, and the Director of Finance.

(f) The regional center shall not be eligible to acquire or develop real property for the purpose of residential housing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may receive and approve a proposal or proposals by any regional center to provide for, secure, or ensure the full payment of a lease or leases on housing based on the availability for occupancy in each home. These proposals shall not include an adult residential facility for persons with special health care needs, as defined in
 Section 1567.50 of the Health and Safety Code. Proposals submitted by regional centers shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) The acquired or developed real property is available for occupancy by individuals eligible for regional center services and is integrated with other housing in the community for people without disabilities.

(2) The regional center has submitted documents demonstrating the appropriate credentials and terms of the project and has approved the proposed nonprofit ownership entity, management entity, and developer or development entity for each project.

(3) The costs associated with the proposal are reasonable and maximize the receipt of federal Medicaid funding. The department shall only approve proposals that include a process for the regional center to review recent sales of comparable
 properties to ensure the purchase price is within the range of fair market value and, if significant renovations of a home will be undertaken after the home is purchased, competing bids for that renovation work to ensure that the cost of the work is reasonable. For purposes of this subdivision, “significant renovations” means renovations that exceed 5 percent of the purchase price of the home.

(4) The proposal includes a plan for a transfer at a time certain of the real property’s ownership to a nonprofit entity to be approved by the regional center.

(5) The regional center has submitted, with the proposal, the nonrefundable developer fee established in subdivision (d).

(b) Prior to approving a regional center proposal pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may contract or consult with a public or private sector
 entity that has appropriate experience in structuring complex real estate financial transactions, but is not otherwise involved in any lending related to the project to review any of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the financing structure for acquisition or development of the real property.

(2) Any and all agreements that govern the real property’s ownership, occupancy, maintenance, management, and operation, to ensure that the use of the property is maintained for the benefit of persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) The department may impose a limit on the number of proposals considered pursuant to subdivision (a). If a limit is imposed, the department shall notify the Association of Regional Center Agencies.

(d) (1) The department shall charge the developer of the housing described in the regional center proposal a reasonable, nonrefundable fee for each proposal submitted. The fee shall be for the purpose of reimbursing the department’s costs associated with conducting the review and approval required by subdivision (b). The fee shall be set by the department within 30 days of the effective date of the act that added this section, and shall be adjusted annually, as necessary, to ensure the payment of the costs incurred by the department.

(2) Fees collected shall be deposited in the Developmental Disabilities Services Account established pursuant to Section 14672.9 of the Government Code and shall be used solely for the purpose of conducting the review and approval required by subdivision (b), upon appropriation by the Legislature. Interest and dividends on moneys collected pursuant to this section shall, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of
 the Government Code, be retained in the account for purposes of this section. Moneys deposited in the Developmental Disabilities Services Account pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the requirements of subdivision (i) of Section 14672.9 of the Government Code.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), for the 2008–09 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may approve an expenditure of up to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) by the department from moneys deposited in the account for the purposes specified in subdivision (b). In the 2009–10 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, moneys shall be available to the department upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(e) No sale, encumbrance, hypothecation, assignment, refinancing, pledge, conveyance, exchange, or transfer in any other form of the real property, or of any of its interest therein, shall occur without the
 prior written approval of the department and the regional center.

(f) Notice of the restrictions pursuant to this section shall be recorded against the acquired or developed real property subject to this section.

(g) At least 30 days prior to granting approval under subdivision (e), the department shall provide notice to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the fiscal committees of the Assembly and the Senate and the Director of Finance.

(h) The regional center shall not be eligible to acquire or develop real property for the purpose of residential housing.

(i) Unless otherwise authorized by law, a regional center shall not use purchase of service funds to implement this section.

(j) With the exception of funds authorized in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), this section shall be implemented within the department’s annual budget. This subdivision shall not preclude the receipt or use of federal, state non-General Fund, or private funds to implement this section.

(k) The department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 190.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.

Consistent with state and federal law, the Legislature places a high priority on providing opportunities for adults with developmental disabilities, regardless of the degree of disability, to live in homes that they own or lease with support available as often and for as long as it is needed, when that is the preferred objective in the individual program plan. In order to provide opportunities for adults to live in their own homes, the following procedures shall be adopted:

(a) The department and regional centers shall ensure that supported living arrangements adhere to the following principles:

(1) Consumers shall be supported in living
 arrangements that are typical of those in which persons without disabilities reside.

(2) The services or supports that a consumer receives shall change as their needs change without the consumer having to move elsewhere.

(3) The consumer’s preference shall guide decisions concerning where and with whom the consumer lives.

(4) Consumers shall have control over the environment within their own home.

(5) The purpose of furnishing services and supports to a consumer shall be to assist that individual to exercise choice in
 their life while building critical and durable relationships with other individuals.

(6) The services or supports shall be flexible and tailored to a consumer’s needs and preferences.

(7) Services and supports are most effective when furnished where a person lives and within the context of the person’s day-to-day activities.

(8) Consumers shall not be excluded from supported living arrangements based solely on the nature and severity of their disabilities.

(b) Regional centers may contract with agencies or individuals to assist consumers in securing their own homes and to provide consumers with the supports needed to live in their own homes.

(c) The range of supported living services and supports available include, but are not limited to, assessment of consumer needs; assistance in finding, modifying and maintaining a home; facilitating circles of support to encourage the development of unpaid and natural supports in the community; advocacy and self-advocacy facilitation; development of employment goals; social, behavioral, and daily living skills training and support; development and provision of 24-hour emergency response systems; securing and maintaining adaptive equipment and supplies; recruiting, training, and hiring individuals to provide personal care and other assistance, including in-home supportive services workers, paid neighbors, and paid roommates; providing respite and emergency relief for personal care attendants; and facilitating community participation.
 Assessment of consumer needs may begin before 18 years of age to enable the consumer to move to their own home when they reach 18 years of age.

(d) Regional centers shall provide information and education to consumers and their families about supported living principles and services.

(e) Regional centers shall monitor and ensure the quality of services and supports provided to individuals living in homes that they own or lease. Monitoring shall take into account all of the following:

(1) Adherence to the principles set forth in this section.

(2) Whether the services and supports outlined in the consumer’s individual program plan are congruent with the
 choices and needs of the individual.

(3) Whether services and supports described in the consumer’s individual program plan are being delivered.

(4) Whether services and supports are having the desired effects.

(5) Whether the consumer is satisfied with the services and supports.

(f) The planning team, established pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 4512, for a consumer receiving supported living services shall confirm that all appropriate and available sources of natural and generic supports have been utilized to the fullest extent possible for that consumer.

(g) Regional centers shall utilize the
 same supported living provider for consumers who reside in the same domicile, provided that each individual consumer’s particular needs can still be met pursuant to their individual program plans.

(h) Rent, mortgage, and lease payments of a supported living home and household expenses shall be the responsibility of the consumer and any roommate who resides with the consumer.

(i) A regional center may make rent, mortgage, or lease payments on a supported living home, or pay for household expenses of consumers receiving supported living services only under the following circumstances:

(1) If all of the following conditions are
 met, a regional center may make rent, mortgage, or lease payments as follows:

(A) The regional center executive director verifies in writing that making the rent, mortgage, or lease payments or paying for household expenses is required to meet the specific care needs unique to the individual consumer as set forth in an addendum to the consumer’s individual program plan, and is required when a consumer’s demonstrated risk of homelessness, medical, behavioral, or psychiatric condition presents a health and safety risk to the consumer or another.

(B) During the time period that a regional center is making rent, mortgage, or lease payments, or paying for household expenses, the supported living services vendor shall assist the consumer in accessing all sources of generic and natural
 supports consistent with the needs of the consumer.

(C) The regional center shall not make rent, mortgage, or lease payments on a supported living home or pay for household expenses for more than six months, unless the regional center finds that it is necessary to meet the individual consumer’s particular needs pursuant to the consumer’s individual program plan. The regional center shall review a finding of necessity on a quarterly basis and the regional center executive director shall annually verify in an addendum to the consumer’s individual program plan that the requirements set forth in subparagraph (A) continue to be met.

(2) A regional center that has been contributing to rent, mortgage, or lease payments or paying for household expenses prior to July 1, 2009,
 shall at the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan determine if the conditions in paragraph (1) are met. If the planning team determines that these contributions are no longer appropriate under this section, a reasonable time for transition, not to exceed six months, shall be permitted.

(j) All paid roommates and live-in support staff in supported living arrangements in which regional centers have made rent, mortgage, or lease payments, or have paid for household expenses pursuant to subdivision (i) shall pay their share of the rent, mortgage, or lease payments or household expenses for the supported living home, subject to the requirements of Industrial Welfare Commission Order No. 15-2001 and the Housing Choice Voucher Program, as set forth in Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United
 States Code.

(k) Regional centers shall ensure that the supported living services vendors’ administrative costs are necessary and reasonable, given the particular services that they are providing and the number of consumers to whom the vendor provides services. Administrative costs shall be limited to allowable costs for community-based day programs, as defined in Section 57434 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or its successor.

(l) Regional centers shall ensure that the most cost effective of the rate methodologies is utilized to determine the negotiated rate for vendors of supported living services, consistent with Section 4689.8 and Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(m) For purposes
 of this section, “household expenses” means general living expenses and includes, but is not limited to, utilities paid and food consumed within the home.

(n) A supported living services provider shall provide assistance to a consumer who is a Medi-Cal beneficiary in applying for in-home supportive services, as set forth in Section 12300, within five days of the consumer moving into a supported living services arrangement.

(o) For consumers receiving supported living services who share a household with one or more adults receiving supported living services, efficiencies in the provision of service may be achieved if some tasks can be shared, meaning the tasks can be provided at the same time while still ensuring that each person’s individual needs are met. These tasks shall only be
 shared to the extent they are permitted under the Labor Code and related regulations, including, but not limited to, Industrial Welfare Commission Minimum Wage Order No. 15. The planning team, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 4512, at the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan (IPP), for housemates currently in a supported living arrangement or planning to move together into a supported living arrangement, or for consumers who live with a housemate not receiving supported living services who is responsible for the task, shall consider, with input from the service provider, whether any tasks, such as meal preparation and cleanup, menu planning, laundry, shopping, general household tasks, or errands can appropriately be shared. If tasks can be appropriately shared, the regional center shall purchase the prorated share of the activity. Upon a
 determination of a reduction in services pursuant to this section, the regional center shall inform the consumer of the reason for the determination, and shall provide a written notice of fair hearing rights pursuant to Section 4701.

(p) (1) To ensure that consumers in or entering into supported living arrangements receive the appropriate amount and type of supports to meet the person’s choice and needs as determined by the IPP team, and that generic resources are utilized to the fullest extent possible, the IPP team shall complete a standardized assessment questionnaire at the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s IPP. The questionnaire shall be used during the individual program plan meetings, in addition to the provider’s assessment, to assist in determining whether the services provided
 or recommended are necessary and sufficient and that the most cost-effective methods of supported living services are utilized. With input from stakeholders, including regional centers, the department shall develop and post the questionnaire on its
 internet website, and, by June 30, 2012, shall provide it to the regional centers.

(2) Supported living service providers shall conduct comprehensive assessments for the purpose of getting to know the consumer they will be supporting and developing a support plan congruent with the choices and needs of the individual and consistent with the principles of supported living set forth in this section and in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 58600) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. The independent assessment required by this paragraph is not intended to take the place of or repeat the service provider’s comprehensive assessment.

(3) Upon a determination of a reduction in services pursuant to this section, the regional
 center shall inform the consumer of the reason for the determination, and shall provide a written notice of fair hearing rights pursuant to Section 4701.

(4) This section does not preclude the completion of an independent assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 441, Sec. 2.   (AB 3291)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.05.

(a) A regional center shall not purchase supportive services, as defined in Section 12300, for a consumer who meets the criteria to receive, but declines to apply for, in-home supportive services (IHSS) benefits, as set forth in Section 12300, except as set forth in subdivision (d).

(b) Consistent with Section 4648, a regional center shall not purchase supported living services for a consumer to supplant IHSS.

(c) Between the date that a consumer applies for IHSS and the date that a consumer’s application for IHSS is approved, a regional center shall not purchase supportive services for the consumer at a rate that exceeds the IHSS hourly rate, which includes the IHSS provider hourly wage, the provider’s hourly payroll taxes, and the hourly administrative costs, for the county in which the consumer resides.

(d) A regional center executive director may waive the requirements set forth in subdivision (a) if the executive director finds that extraordinary circumstances warrant the waiver, and that a finding is documented in an addendum to the consumer’s individual program plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 25.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.1.

(a) The Legislature declares that it places a high priority on providing opportunities for adults with developmental disabilities to live with families approved by family home agencies and to receive services and supports in those settings as determined by the individual program plan. Family home agencies may offer services and supports in family homes or family teaching homes. All requirements of this section and Sections 4689.2 to 4689.6, inclusive, shall apply to a family home and a family teaching home.

(b) For purposes of this section, “family home” means a home that is owned, leased, or rented by, and is the family residence of, the family home provider or providers, and in which services and supports are provided to a maximum of two adults with
 developmental disabilities regardless of their degree of disability, and who do not require continuous skilled nursing care.

(c) For purposes of this section, “family teaching home” means a home that is owned, leased, or rented by the family home agency wherein the family home provider and the individual have independent residences, either contiguous or attached, and in which services and supports are provided to a maximum of three adults with developmental disabilities regardless of their degree of disability, and who do not require continuous skilled nursing care.

(d) For purposes of this section, “family home agency” means a private for-profit or not-for-profit agency that is vendored to do all of the following:

(1) Recruit, approve, train, and monitor family home providers.

(2) Provide social services and in-home support to family home providers.

(3) Assist adults with developmental disabilities in moving into approved family homes.

(e) For purposes of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services that provide supports in natural settings and promote inclusion and meaningful participation in community life for adults with developmental disabilities, the department shall promulgate regulations for family home agencies, family teaching homes, and family homes that shall include, but not be limited to, standards and requirements related to all of the following:

(1) Selection criteria for regional centers to apply in vendoring family home agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The need for service.

(B) The experience of the agency or key personnel in providing the same or comparable services.

(C) The reasonableness of the agency’s overhead.

(D) The capability of the regional center to monitor and evaluate the vendor.

(2) Vendorization.

(3) Operation of family home agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Recruitment.

(B) Approval of family homes.

(C) Qualifications, training, and
 monitoring of family home providers.

(D) Assistance to consumers in moving into approved family homes.

(E) The range of services and supports to be provided.

(F) Family home agency staffing levels, qualifications, and training.

(4) Program design.

(5) Program and consumer records.

(6) Family homes.

(7) (A) Rates of payment for family home agencies and approved family home providers. Regional center reimbursement to family home
 agencies for services in a family home shall not exceed rates established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4681.5 for individuals who reside in a community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that is vendored for four beds or fewer.

(B) (i) The department may establish a distinct service code and rate model for the family teaching home that is separate from the service code and rate model for the family home agency and that considers costs for housing, staffing, and census.

(ii) If the department establishes a distinct service code and rate model pursuant to clause (i), the department shall post the service code and rate model on its internet website.

(iii) A family home
 agency that provides a family teaching home shall use the service code and rate model described in clause (i) for the family teaching home, if established by the department.

(8) The department and regional center’s monitoring and evaluation of the family home agency and approved homes, which shall be designed to ensure that services do all of the following:

(A) Conform to applicable laws and regulations and provide for the consumer’s health and well-being.

(B) Assist the consumer in understanding and exercising their individual rights.

(C) Are consistent with the family home agency’s program design and the consumer’s individual program plan.

(D) Maximize the
 consumer’s opportunities to have choices in where the consumer lives, works, and socializes.

(E) Provide a supportive family home environment, available to the consumer 24 hours per day, that is clean, comfortable, and accommodating to the consumer’s cultural preferences, values, and lifestyle.

(F) Are satisfactory to the consumer, as indicated by the consumer’s quality of life as assessed by the consumer, their family, and, if appointed, conservator, or significant others, or all of these, as well as by evaluation of outcomes relative to individual program plan objectives.

(9) Monthly monitoring visits by family home agency social service staff to approved family homes and family teaching homes.

(10) Procedures whereby the regional center and the
 department may enforce applicable provisions of law and regulation, investigate allegations of abuse or neglect, and impose sanctions on family home agencies and approved family homes and family teaching homes, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Requiring movement of a consumer from a family home under specified circumstances.

(B) Termination of approval of a family home or family teaching home.

(C) Termination of the family home agency’s vendorization.

(11) Appeal procedures.

(f) Each adult with developmental disabilities placed in a family home or family teaching home shall have the rights specified in this division, including, but not limited to, the rights
 specified in Section 4503.

(g) Prior to placement in a family home of an adult with developmental disabilities who has a conservator, consent of the conservator shall be obtained.

(h) The adoption of any emergency regulations to implement this section that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law within one year of the date on which the act that added this section took effect shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 38.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the filing of fingerprints of those individuals whose contact with consumers receiving services and supports from family home agencies, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4689.1, and family homes, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 4689.1, may pose a risk to the consumers’ health and safety.

(b) As part of the vendor approval process for family home agencies and family homes, the State
 Department of Developmental Services shall secure from the Department of Justice and, if applicable, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, a full criminal history to determine whether the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (c) has ever been convicted of, or arrested for, a crime other than a minor traffic violation. If it is found that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (c), has been convicted of, or is awaiting trial for, a crime other than a minor traffic violation, the vendor application shall be denied, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the applicant and the State Department of Developmental Services with a statement of that fact.

(c) In addition to the applicant, this section shall be applicable to criminal convictions of the following persons:

(1) Adults responsible for administration or direct supervision of staff.

(2) Any adult other than a consumer residing in the family home.

(3) Any adult who provides assistance to the consumer in dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene.

(4) Any staff person, employee, consultant, or volunteer who has frequent and routine contact with the consumer. In determining who has frequent contact, any consultant or volunteer shall be exempt unless the volunteer is used to replace or supplement staff or family home personnel in providing services or supports, or both, to consumers. In determining who has routine contact, staff and employees under direct onsite supervision of the family home agency and who are not providing direct services and supports or who
 have only occasional or intermittent contact with consumers shall be exempt.

(5) The executive director of the entity applying for vendorization or other person serving in like capacity.

(6) Officers of the governing body of the applicant, or other persons with a financial interest in the applicant, as determined necessary by the department by regulation. The criteria used in the development of these regulations shall be based on the person’s capability to exercise substantial influence over the operation of the family home agency or family home.

(d) (1) Subsequent to vendorization, any person specified in subdivision (c) and not exempted from fingerprinting shall, as a condition to employment, residence, or presence in a family home agency or a family home, be fingerprinted and sign a
 declaration under penalty of perjury regarding any prior criminal convictions. The vendor shall submit these fingerprints to the Department of Justice not later than four calendar days following employment, residence, or initial presence in the family home agency or family home. These fingerprints shall be on a card provided by the State Department of Developmental Services for the purpose of obtaining a permanent set of fingerprints. If fingerprints are not submitted to the Department of Justice, as required in this section, that failure shall result in a sanction and the fingerprints shall then be submitted to the State Department of Developmental Services for processing. Upon request of the vendor, who shall enclose a self-addressed stamped postcard for this purpose, the Department of Justice shall verify receipt of the fingerprints.

(2) Within 30 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprints, the Department of Justice shall notify the
 State Department of Developmental Services of the criminal record information, as provided in subdivision (b). If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the vendor and the State Department of Developmental Services with a statement of that fact within 15 calendar days of receipt of the fingerprints. If new fingerprints are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, within 15 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprints, notify the vendor that the fingerprints were illegible.

(3) (A) Except for persons specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the vendor shall endeavor to ascertain the previous employment history of persons required to be fingerprinted under this subdivision. If it is determined by the State Department of Developmental Services, on the basis of the fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice, that the person has
 been convicted of, or is awaiting trial for, a sex offense against a minor, or has been convicted for an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273d, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 368 of the Penal Code, or has been convicted of a felony, the State Department of Developmental Services shall notify the vendor to act immediately to terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the family home, or bar the person from entering the family home. The State Department of Developmental Services may subsequently grant an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).

(B) If the conviction or arrest was for another crime, except a minor traffic violation, the vendor shall, upon notification by the State Department of Developmental Services, act immediately to do either of the following:

(i) Terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the family home, or bar the
 person from entering the family home.

(ii) Seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The State Department of Developmental Services shall determine if the person shall be permitted to remain in the family home until a decision on the exemption is rendered.

(e) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the State Department of Developmental Services is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw his or her
 plea of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the arrest disposition report certified by the Department of Justice and, if applicable, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or documents admissible in a criminal action pursuant to Section 969b of the Penal Code, shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction, notwithstanding any other provision of law prohibiting the admission of these documents in a civil or administrative action.

(f) After review of the record, the Director of Developmental Services may grant an exemption from denial of vendor approval pursuant to subdivision (b), or for
 employment in a family home agency or family home of residence or presence in a family home as specified in subdivision (c), if the director has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant and the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, are of such good character as to justify vendor approval or granting an exemption for purposes of subdivision (c). Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, no exemption shall be granted if the conviction was for an offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, 264.1, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 273a, Section 273d, 288, 289, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 368 of the Penal Code, or for another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code. The director may grant an exemption if the employee, prospective employee, or other person identified in subdivision (c) who was convicted of a crime against an individual in paragraph (1), (2), (7), or (8) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, has been rehabilitated as provided in Section 4852.03 of the Penal Code and has maintained the conduct required in Section 4852.05 of the Penal Code for at least 10 years and has the recommendation of the district attorney representing the employee’s county of residence, or if the employee, prospective employee, or other persons identified in subdivision (c) has received a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(g) For purposes of compliance with this section, the department may permit an individual to transfer a current criminal record clearance, as described in subdivision (b), from one family home agency or family home to another, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through the State Department of Developmental Services.

(h) If a family home agency or a family home is required by law to deny employment or to terminate employment of any employee based on written notification from the state department pursuant to subdivision (c) the family home agency or the family home shall not incur civil liability or unemployment insurance liability as a result of that denial or termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.3.

(a) A family home agency shall not place an adult with developmental disabilities in a family home until the family home agency has received a criminal record clearance from the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to Section 4689.2, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Any peace officer, or other category of person approved by the department subject to criminal record clearance as a condition of employment, and who has submitted fingerprints and
 executed a declaration regarding criminal convictions, may receive an adult with developmental disabilities in placement pending the receipt of a criminal record clearance when the family home has met all other requirements for vendor approval.

(c) Any person currently approved as a vendor pursuant to this chapter by the department when the family home has met all other requirements, and who has submitted fingerprints and executed a declaration regarding criminal convictions, may receive, or continue, an adult with developmental disabilities in placement pending the receipt of a criminal record clearance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1095, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.4.

The State Department of Developmental Services may deny an application for vendorization or terminate vendorization as a family home agency or family home upon the grounds that the applicant for vendorization, the vendor, or any other person mentioned in Section 4689.2 has been convicted at any time of a crime, except a minor traffic violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1095, Sec. 10.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.5.

(a) Proceeding for the termination, or denial of vendorization as a family home agency or family home pursuant to Section 4689.4 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the State Department of Developmental Services shall have all the powers granted by Chapter 5. In the event of conflict between this section and Chapter 5, Chapter 5 shall prevail.

(b) In all proceedings
 conducted in accordance with this section, the standard of proof to be applied shall be a preponderance of the evidence.

(c) The hearing shall be held within 90 calendar days after receipt of the notice of defense, unless a continuance of the hearing is granted by the department or the administrative law judge. When the matter has been set for hearing, only the administrative law judge may grant a continuance of the hearing. The administrative law judge may grant a continuance of the hearing, but only upon finding the existence of one or more of the following:
